Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4505
Application; governing law.

The Uniform Trust Decanting Act applies to a trust created before, on, or after November 14, 2020, which:

(1) has its principal place of administration in this state, including a trust whose principal place of administration has been changed to this state; or

(2) provides by its trust instrument that it is governed by the law of this state or is governed by the law of this state for the purpose of:

(A) administration, including administration of a trust whose governing law for purposes of administration has been changed to the law of this state;

(B) construction of terms of the trust; or

(C) determining the meaning or effect of terms of the trust.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 15.